Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4502.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 725. (1) The department shall issue a certificate as a certified public accountant to an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is of good moral character. (b) Has complied with the education requirements of subsection (2). (c) Has passed an examination meeting the requirements of subsection (3). (d) Has complied with the experience requirements of subsection (4). (e) Has completed at least 150 not less than 60 semester hours of college education, including a baccalaureate an associate degree or higher degree with a concentration in accounting, at an educational institution approved by the board. (2) An individual who has completed a curriculum required for a baccalaureate an associate degree with a concentration in accounting at an educational institution approved by the board may sit for the examination required under subsection (3). (3) An applicant for a certificate as a certified public accountant shall pass an examination in accounting, auditing, and other related subjects, acceptable to the department and the board, that is given reciprocal status in the plurality of states as compared to other examinations. (4) For an application for a certificate as a certified public accountant received on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, November 23, 2010, or an application received before that date November 23, 2010 if a certificate of certified public accountant has not been issued, the applicant shall must have 1 year of qualifying experience, all of which is verified by a certified public accountant of this state, any other another state, or any jurisdiction of the United States, submitted on a form prescribed by the department. Qualified experience is experience gained through employment in government, industry, academia, or public practice in 1 or more of the following areas: (a) Audits of financial statements in accordance with the applicable standards at the time of engagement. (b) Reviews of financial statements in accordance with the applicable standards at the time of engagement. (c) Compilations of financial statements with complete disclosure in accordance with the applicable standards at the time of engagement. (d) Attestation engagements in accordance with the applicable standards at the time of engagement. (e) Other auditing in accordance with applicable standards at the time of engagement that leads to an expression of a written opinion including any of the following: (i) Reviews regarding internal control. (ii) Operational audits. (iii) Compliance audits. (iv) Expressions of an opinion on financial forecasts and projections. (f) Performance of an independent internal audit function. (g) Compliance audits of government contracts performed on behalf of a government agency that result in the issuance of an opinion or report. (h) Audits performed on behalf of a government audit agency that result in the issuance of an opinion or report. (i) Preparation of income and nonprofit tax returns for any taxing jurisdiction. (j) Properly documented tax research. (k) Representation of a client before a government agency on a tax matter. (l) Financial forecasts, analyses, and projections. (m) Management advisory services including, but not limited to, business valuation, forensic accounting, and fraud examination services that meet applicable standards. (n) Management and supervision of accounting functions and preparing financial statements for profit or nonprofit entities. (o) Professional accounting-related work in a public accounting firm. (p) Other work generally associated with the profession of public accounting. (5) An applicant for certification under this section shall not receive credit as qualifying experience for either of the following: (a) Experience consisting of nonprofessional work, including recruiting, industrial engineering, administration, bookkeeping, and appraisals. (b) Paraprofessional work that does not comply with subsection (4)(o). Sec. 727a. (1) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state is considered to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements, has all the privileges of licensees of this state, and may practice public accountancy without the need to obtain a certificate, license, or temporary practice permit under this article, if the individual meets either or both of the following: (a) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from another licensing jurisdiction that requires, as a condition of licensure, that the individual meets all of the following: (i) Has at least 150 not less than 60 semester hours of college education including a baccalaureate an associate degree or higher degree conferred by a college or university. (ii) Achieves a passing grade on the uniform CPA exam. (iii) Possesses at least not less than 1 year of experience including providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax, or consulting skills, all of which may be obtained through government, industry, academic, or public practice as verified by a licensee. (b) Holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from another licensing jurisdiction that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a), but has certified public accountant qualifications that are substantially equivalent to those requirements. Any individual who passed the uniform CPA exam and holds a valid license issued by another licensing jurisdiction before January 1, 2012 is exempt from the education requirement in subdivision (a)(i) for purposes of this subdivision. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person or by mail, telephone, or electronic means under this section, shall be is granted practice privileges in this state, and no notice, fee, or other submission is required of that individual. An individual described in this subsection is subject to the requirements of section 734a.